Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.030

Application of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1) Bona fide trade, business, professional, or fraternal organizations conducting educational programs primarily for that organization's membership or offered by that organization on a no-fee basis;

(2) Entities offering education that is exclusively avocational or recreational;

(3) Education not requiring payment of money or other consideration if this education is not advertised or promoted as leading toward educational credentials;

(4) Entities that are established, operated, and governed by this state or its political subdivisions under Title 28A or 28B RCW or this title;

(5) Degree-granting programs in compliance with the rules of the student achievement council;

(6) Any other entity to the extent that it has been exempted from some or all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW 28C.10.100;

(7) Entities not otherwise exempt that are of a religious character, but only as to those educational programs exclusively devoted to religious or theological objectives and represented accurately in institutional catalogs or other official publications;

(8) Entities offering only courses certified by the federal aviation administration;

(9) Barber and cosmetology schools licensed under chapter 18.16 RCW;

(10) Entities which only offer courses approved to meet the continuing education requirements for licensure under chapter 18.04, 18.79, or 48.17 RCW; and

(11) Entities not otherwise exempt offering only workshops or seminars lasting no longer than three calendar days.

[ 2014 c 11 s 1; 2012 c 229 s 576; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 723; 1990 c 188 s 6; 1986 c 299 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Severability—1990 c 188: See note following RCW 28C.10.020.